Florida, session 2026, HB1261.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Effective July 1, 2026, present subsections
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1261-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1261 2026
(13) through (18) of section 409.962, Florida Statutes, are
redesignated as subsections (14) through (19), respectively, and
a new subsection (13) is added to that section, to read:
409.962 Definitions.—As used in this part, except as
otherwise specifically provided, the term:
(13) "Pediatric continuing care integrated community"
means a group of affiliated and integrated businesses that, as
of July 1, 2026, are licensed or certified by the agency or the
Agency for Persons with Disabilities and collectively provide
coordinated care for Medicaid-eligible persons younger than 21
years of age who are medically fragile, including those who are
technology dependent. The term includes all of the following
entities under common ownership:
(a) A community residential group home licensed under
chapter 393 providing residential care for medically complex
children.
(b) A home health agency licensed under part III of
chapter 400 providing private duty nursing services by
registered nurses or licensed practical nurses.
(c) A prescribed pediatric extended care center licensed
under part VI of chapter 400.
(d) A home medical equipment provider licensed under part
VII of chapter 400.
(e) A health care clinic licensed under part X of chapter
400 providing speech-language therapy, physical therapy, or
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1261-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1261 2026
occupational therapy.
Section 2. Subsection (7) is added to section 409.975,
Florida Statutes, to read:
409.975 Managed care plan accountability.—In addition to
the requirements of s. 409.967, plans and providers
participating in the managed medical assistance program shall
comply with the requirements of this section.
(7) REIMBURSEMENT FOR SERVICES IN PEDIATRIC CONTINUING
CARE INTEGRATED COMMUNITIES.—
(a) As used in this subsection, the term "Medicaid region"
means any of the regions established by the agency for the
purpose of managed medical assistance.
(b) Medicaid managed care plans shall reimburse home
health agencies licensed under part III of chapter 400 for
private duty nursing services, including services provided by
registered nurses and licensed practical nurses, provided in a
community residential group home at an amount no less than the
Private Duty Nursing Fee Schedule set by the agency, regardless
of the number of plan members who share a dwelling space within
the community residential group home. However, mutually
acceptable higher rates may be negotiated for medically complex
care.
(c) Reimbursement may not be reduced based on the number
of Medicaid-eligible persons receiving private duty nursing
services in the same dwelling space, or on the same day, within
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1261-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1261 2026
the community residential group home.
(d) Managed care plans and the affiliated businesses shall
negotiate rates at least annually for medical services provided
within the pediatric continuing care integrated community.
(e) Upon request by a provider, a Medicaid managed care
plan must provide a written certification that the reimbursement
rate offered for services within the pediatric continuing care
integrated community is not less than the rate paid by that plan
for private duty nursing services provided in private residences
within the same Medicaid region.
Section 3. Within 30 days after the effective date of this
act, the Agency for Health Care Administration shall seek any
necessary federal approval, including through any necessary
state plan amendment or Medicaid waiver, to implement the
changes made by this act. The agency shall implement this act
upon receipt of federal approval.
Section 4. Except as otherwise provided in this act, this
act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1261-00